Tennessee, session 114, SB0971.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 41-2-152(c), is amended by adding
the following as a new subdivision:
(3) The prisoner was convicted of a non-violent crime, and the sheriff determines
that the prisoner poses a low risk to the public and for escape.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0971
001778
- 1 -